Florida, session 2026, HB673.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (14) is added to section 704.06,
Florida Statutes, to read:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb673-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 673 2026
704.06 Conservation easements; creation; acquisition;
enforcement.—
(14)(a) Upon application by the fee simple owner of a
parcel of land subject to a conservation easement to a water
management district, a water management district must release
the conservation easement if the following conditions are met:
1. The land subject to the easement is less than 15 acres
and is bordered on three or more sides by impervious surfaces;
2. Any undeveloped adjacent parcels of land are less than
15 acres and similarly bordered on three or more sides by
impervious surfaces;
3. The land contains no historical, architectural,
archeological, or cultural significance; and
4. The applicant has secured the one-time sufficient
mitigation credits and has compensated the water management
district by using the uniform mitigation assessment method from
a mitigation bank located in this state to offset the loss of
any wetlands located on the land subject to the conservation
easement.
(b) Upon the water management district's release of the
conservation easement, the ad valorem taxes on the property must
be based on the just value of the property, and the property may
be used for development that is consistent with the zoning
designation of the adjacent lands.
(c) The property owner shall assume responsibility for any
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb673-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 673 2026
requirements, including stormwater requirements, if the property
is developed.
(d) The property owner shall comply with all local
ordinances, including those relating to stormwater management,
for any development proposed for the subject parcel and, if
applicable, seek district approval for the modification of any
permits, including stormwater permits, upon which the
conservation easement was a condition.
(e) This subsection does not apply to conservation
easements located within residential developments or to
proprietary conservation easements held by a district. For
purposes of this paragraph, "proprietary conservation easement"
means a conservation easement that was not acquired as a
condition for a permit.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb673-01-c1